Utah statutes.
78B-6-104.   Limitations.
(1)  Sections 78B-6-143 through 78B-6-145 do not apply to adoptions by a
stepparent whose spouse is the adoptee's birth parent.
(2)  Sections 78B-6-143 through 78B-6-145 apply only to adoptions of adoptees
born in this state.
